Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 10. Appropriate Municipal Panels

§ 4460.
Appropriate municipal panels.

If a municipality establishes a development review board and appoints members to that board, the development review board in that municipality, until its existence is terminated by act of the legislative body, shall exercise all of the functions otherwise exercised under this chapter by the board of adjustment. It also shall exercise the specified development review functions otherwise exercised under this chapter by the planning commission. In municipalities that have created development review boards, the planning commission shall continue to exercise its planning and bylaw development functions and other duties established under this chapter. In situations where this chapter refers to functions that may be performed by a development review board or a planning commission or functions that may be performed by a development review board or a board of adjustment, it is intended that the function in question shall be performed by the development review board if one exists and by the other specified body if a development review board does not exist.

The board of adjustment or the development review board for a rural town or an urban municipality may consist of the members of the planning commission of that town or may include one or more members of the planning commission. The board of adjustment for a rural town or an urban municipality shall consist of not fewer than three nor more than nine persons, as the legislative body of the municipality determines, appointed by the legislative body of the municipality promptly after the first adoption of a bylaw by the municipality. If the legislative body of a municipality creates a development review board to perform all development review functions under this chapter, that board shall consist of not fewer than five nor more than nine persons, as the legislative body of the municipality determines, appointed by the legislative body of the municipality. A municipality may not have a board of adjustment and a development review board at the same time. Upon creation of a development review board, the existence of any board of adjustment shall terminate.

In the case of an urban municipality or of a rural town where the planning commission does not serve as the board of adjustment or the development review board, members of the board of adjustment or the development review board shall be appointed by the legislative body, the number and terms of office of which shall be determined by the legislative body subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. The municipal legislative body may appoint alternates to a planning commission, a board of adjustment, or a development review board for a term to be determined by the legislative body. Alternates may be assigned by the legislative body to serve on the planning commission, the board of adjustment, or the development review board in situations when one or more members of the board are disqualified or are otherwise unable to serve. Vacancies shall be filled by the legislative body for the unexpired terms and upon the expiration of such terms. Each member of a board of adjustment or a development review board may be removed for cause by the legislative body upon written charges and after public hearing. If a development review board is created, provisions of this subsection regarding removal of members of the board of adjustment shall not apply.

A joint board of adjustment or development review board may be created upon the act of each legislative body of those municipalities having joint planning commissions as provided in section 4327 of this title. The joint board of adjustment or development review board for these participating municipalities shall consist of persons who would have been the members of the board of adjustment or development review board of each of those municipalities. Joint entities created under this subsection may include a board of adjustment and a development review board, if those different entities exist in the participating municipalities.

The following review functions shall be performed by the appropriate municipal panel authorized by a municipality as specified in the municipal bylaws and in accordance with this chapter, whether a zoning board of adjustment, planning commission, or development review board. Unless the matter is an appeal from the decision of the administrative officer, the matter shall come before the panel by referral from the administrative officer. Any such referral decision shall be appealable as a decision of the administrative officer.

review of right-of-way or easement for land development without frontage as authorized in subdivision 4412(3) of this title;

review of land development or use within an historic district or with respect to historic landmarks as authorized in subdivision 4414(1)(F) of this title;

review of land development or use within a design control district as authorized in subdivision 4414(1)(E) of this title;

review of proposed conditional uses as authorized in subdivision 4414(3) of this title;

review of planned unit developments as authorized in section 4417 of this title;

review of requests for waivers as authorized in subdivision 4414(9) of this title;

site plan review as authorized in section 4416 of this title;

review of proposed subdivisions as authorized in section 4418 of this title;

review of wireless telecommunications facilities as authorized in subdivision 4414(12) of this title;

appeals from a decision of the administrative officer pursuant to section 4465 of this title;

review of requests for variances pursuant to section 4469 of this title;

any other reviews required by the bylaws.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 103; amended

2013, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 4461.
Development review procedures.

Meetings. An appropriate municipal panel shall elect its own officers and adopt rules of procedure, subject to this section and other applicable State statutes, and shall adopt rules of ethics with respect to conflicts of interest. Meetings of any appropriate municipal panel shall be held at the call of the chairperson and at such times as the panel may determine. The officers of the panel may administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of material germane to any issue under review. All meetings of the panel, except for deliberative and executive sessions, shall be open to the public. The panel shall keep minutes of its proceedings, showing the vote of each member upon each question, or, if absent or failing to vote, indicating this, and shall keep records of its examinations and other official actions, all of which shall be filed immediately in the office of the clerk of the municipality as a public record. For the conduct of any hearing and the taking of any action, a quorum shall be not less than a majority of the members of the panel, and any action of the panel shall be taken by the concurrence of a majority of the panel.

Information gathering and record of participation by interested persons. An appropriate municipal panel in connection with any proceeding under this chapter may examine or cause to be examined any property, maps, books, or records bearing upon the matters concerned in that proceeding, may require the attendance of any person having knowledge in the premises, may take testimony and require proof material for its information, and may administer oaths or take acknowledgment in respect of those matters. Any of the powers granted to an appropriate municipal panel by this subsection may be delegated by it to a specifically authorized agent or representative, except in situations where the Municipal Administrative Procedure Act applies. In any hearing, there shall be an opportunity for each person wishing to achieve status as an interested person under subsection 4465(b) of this title to demonstrate that the criteria set forth in that subsection are met, and the panel shall keep a written record of the name, address, and participation of each of these persons.

Expenditures for service. An appropriate municipal panel may employ or contract for secretaries, clerks, legal counsel, consultants, and other technical and clerical services. All members of an appropriate municipal panel may be compensated for the performance of their duties and may be reimbursed by their municipality for necessary and reasonable expenses.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 104.

§ 4462.
Combined review.

If more than one type of review is required for a project, the reviews, to the extent feasible, shall be conducted concurrently. A process defining the sequence of review and issuance of decisions shall be defined in the bylaw.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 104.

§ 4463.
Subdivision review.

Approval of plats. Before any plat is approved, a public hearing on the plat shall be held by the appropriate municipal panel after public notice. A copy of the notice shall be sent to the clerk of an adjacent municipality, in the case of a plat located within 500 feet of a municipal boundary, at least 15 days prior to the public hearing.

Plat; record. The approval of the appropriate municipal panel shall expire 180 days from that approval or certification unless, within that 180-day period, that plat shall have been duly filed or recorded in the office of the clerk of the municipality. After an approved plat or certification by the clerk is filed, no expiration of that approval or certification shall be applicable.

The bylaw may allow the administrative officer to extend the date for filing the plat by an additional 90 days, if final local or State permits or approvals are still pending.

No plat showing a new street or highway may be filed or recorded in the office of the clerk of the municipality until it has been approved by the appropriate municipal panel, and that approval is endorsed in writing on the plat, or the certificate of the clerk of the municipality showing the failure of the appropriate municipal panel to take action within the 45-day period is attached to the plat and filed or recorded with the plat. After that filing or recording, the plat shall be a part of the official map of the municipality.

Acceptance of streets; improvements. Every street or highway shown on a plat filed or recorded as provided in this chapter shall be deemed to be a private street or highway until it has been formally accepted by the municipality as a public street or highway by ordinance or resolution of the legislative body of the municipality. No public municipal street, utility, or improvement may be constructed by the municipality in or on any street or highway until it has become a public street or highway as provided in this section. The legislative body shall have authority after a public hearing on the subject to name and rename all public streets and to number and renumber lots so as to provide for existing as well as future structures.

Beginning October 1, 2010, any application for an approval and any approval issued under this section shall include a statement, in content and form approved by the Secretary of Natural Resources, that State permits may be required and that the permittee should contact State agencies to determine what permits must be obtained before any construction may commence.

Whenever a proposed subdivision is adjacent to a State highway, the application for subdivision approval shall include a letter from the Agency of Transportation confirming that the Agency has reviewed the proposed subdivision and determined whether a permit is required under

19 V.S.A. § 1111

. If the Agency determines that a permit for the proposed subdivision is required under

19 V.S.A. § 1111

, then the letter from the Agency shall set out any conditions that the Agency proposes to attach to the permit required under 19 V.S.A. § 1111.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 104; amended

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § F28;

2021, No. 55

, § 37.

§ 4464.
Hearing and notice requirements; decisions and conditions; administrative review; role of advisory commissions in development review.

Notice procedures. All development review applications before an appropriate municipal panel under procedures set forth in this chapter shall require notice as follows.

A warned public hearing shall be required for conditional use review, variances, administrative officer appeals, and final plat review for subdivisions. Any public notice for a warned public hearing shall be given not less than 15 days prior to the date of the public hearing by all the following:

Publication of the date, place, and purpose of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality affected.

Posting of the same information in three or more public places within the municipality in conformance with location requirements of

1 V.S.A. § 312(c)(2)

, including posting within view from the public right-of-way most nearly adjacent to the property for which an application is made.

Written notification to the applicant and to owners of all properties adjoining the property subject to development, including the owners of properties which would be contiguous to the property subject to development but for the interposition of a highway or other public right-of-way and, in any situation in which a variance is sought regarding setbacks from a State highway, also including written notification to the Secretary of Transportation. The notification shall include a description of the proposed project and shall be accompanied by information that clearly informs the recipient where additional information may be obtained, and that participation in the local proceeding is a prerequisite to the right to take any subsequent appeal.

Public notice for hearings on all other types of development review, including site plan review, shall be given not less than seven days prior to the date of the public hearing, and shall include at a minimum all the following:

Posting of the date, place, and purpose of the hearing in three or more public places within the municipality in conformance with the time and location requirements of

1 V.S.A. § 312(c)(2)

.

Written notification to the applicant and to the owners of all properties adjoining the property subject to development, including the owners of properties which would be contiguous to the property subject to development but for the interposition of a highway or other public right-of-way and, in any situation in which a variance is sought regarding setbacks from a State highway, also including written notification to the Secretary of Transportation. The notification shall include a description of the proposed project and shall be accompanied by information that clearly informs the recipient where additional information may be obtained, and that participation in the local proceeding is a prerequisite to the right to take any subsequent appeal.

The applicant may be required to bear the cost of the public warning and the cost and responsibility of notification of adjoining landowners. The applicant may be required to demonstrate proof of delivery to adjoining landowners either by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by written notice hand delivered or mailed to the last known address supported by a sworn certificate of service.

The bylaw may also require public notice through other effective means such as a notice board on a municipal website.

No defect in the form or substance of any requirements in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection shall invalidate the action of the appropriate municipal panel where reasonable efforts are made to provide adequate posting and notice. However, the action shall be invalid when the defective posting or notice was materially misleading in content. If an action is ruled to be invalid by the Environmental Division or by the applicable municipal panel itself, the action shall be remanded to the applicable municipal panel to provide new posting and notice, hold a new hearing, and take a new action.

Decisions.

The appropriate municipal panel may recess the proceedings on any application pending submission of additional information. The panel should close the evidence promptly after all parties have submitted the requested information. The panel shall adjourn the hearing and issue a decision within 45 days after the adjournment of the hearing, and failure of the panel to issue a decision within this period shall be deemed approval and shall be effective on the 46th day. Decisions shall be issued in writing and shall include a statement of the factual bases on which the appropriate municipal panel has made its conclusions and a statement of the conclusions. The minutes of the meeting may suffice, provided the factual bases and conclusions relating to the review standards are provided in conformance with this subsection.

In rendering a decision in favor of the applicant, the panel may attach additional reasonable conditions and safeguards as it deems necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter and the pertinent bylaws and the municipal plan then in effect. A bylaw may provide for the conditioning of permit issuance on the submission of a bond, escrow account, or other surety in a form acceptable to the legislative body of the municipality to assure one or more of the following: the completion of the project, adequate stabilization, or protection of public facilities that may be affected by a project.

Any decision shall be sent by certified mail within the period set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection to the applicant and the appellant in matters on appeal. Copies of the decision shall also be mailed to every person or body appearing and having been heard at the hearing and a copy of the decision shall be filed with the administrative officer and the clerk of the municipality as a part of the public records of the municipality.

Conditions may require that no zoning permit, except for any permits that may be required for infrastructure construction, may be issued for an approved development unless the streets and other required public improvements have been satisfactorily installed in accordance with the approval decision and pertinent bylaws. In lieu of the completion of the required public improvements, the appropriate municipal panel may require from the owner for the benefit of the municipality a performance bond issued either by a bonding or surety company approved by the legislative body or by the owner with security acceptable to the legislative body in an amount sufficient to cover the full cost of those new streets and required improvements on or in those streets or highways and their maintenance for a period of two years after completion as is estimated by the appropriate municipal panel or such municipal departments or officials as the panel may designate. This bond or other security shall provide for, and secure to the public, the completion of any improvements that may be required within the period fixed in the subdivision bylaws for that completion and for the maintenance of those improvements for a period of two years after completion.

The legislative body may enter into an agreement governing any combination of the timing, financing, and coordination of private or public facilities and improvements in accordance with the terms and conditions of a municipal land use permit, provided that agreement is in compliance with all applicable bylaws in effect.

The performance bond required by this subsection shall run for a term to be fixed by the appropriate municipal panel, but in no case for a longer term than three years. However, with the consent of the owner, the term of that bond may be extended for an additional period not to exceed three years. If any required improvements have not been installed or maintained as provided within the term of the performance bond, the bond shall be forfeited to the municipality and upon receipt of the proceeds of the bond, the municipality shall install or maintain such improvements as are covered by the performance bond.

Administrative review. In addition to the delegation of powers authorized under this chapter, any bylaws adopted under this chapter may establish procedures under which the administrative officer may review and approve new development and amendments to previously approved development that would otherwise require review by an appropriate municipal panel. If administrative review is authorized, the bylaws shall clearly specify the thresholds and conditions under which the administrative officer classifies an application as eligible for administrative review. The thresholds and conditions shall be structured such that no new development shall be approved that results in a substantial impact under any of the standards set forth in the bylaws. No amendment issued as an administrative review shall have the effect of substantively altering any of the findings of fact of the most recent approval. Any decision by an administrative officer under this subsection may be appealed as provided in section 4465 of this title.

Role of advisory commissions in development review. An advisory commission that has been established through section 4433 or chapter 118 of this title and that has been granted authority under the bylaws, by ordinance, or by resolution of the legislative body to advise the appropriate municipal panel or panels, applicants, and interested parties should perform the advisory function in the following manner:

The administrative officer shall provide a copy or copies of applications subject to review by the advisory commission and all supporting information to the advisory commission upon determination that the application is complete.

The advisory commission may review the application and prepare recommendations on each of the review standards within the commission’s purview for consideration by the appropriate municipal panel at the public hearing on the application. The commission or individual members of the commission may meet with the applicant, interested parties, or both, conduct site visits, and perform other fact-finding that will enable the preparation of recommendations.

Meetings by the advisory commission on the application shall comply with the Open Meeting Law, 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 2, and the requirements of the commission’s rules of procedure, but shall not be conducted as public hearings before a quasi-judicial body.

The advisory commission’s recommendations may be presented in writing at or before the public hearing of the appropriate municipal panel on the application, or may be presented orally at the public hearing.

If the advisory commission finds that an application fails to comply with one or more of the review standards, it shall make every effort to inform the applicant of the negative recommendations before the public hearing, giving the applicant an opportunity to withdraw the application or otherwise prepare a response to the advisory committee’s recommendations at the public hearing. Advisory commissions may also suggest remedies to correct the deficiencies that resulted in the negative recommendations.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 104; amended

2007, No. 75

, § 29;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236.